Washington statutes.
RCW 43.31.215

Hanford reservation—Tri-Cities area—Emphasize workforce and facilities.

When the department implements programs intended to attract or maintain industrial or high-technology investments in the state, the department shall, to the extent possible, emphasize the following:

(1) The highly skilled and trained workforce in the Tri-Cities area;

(2) The world-class research facilities in the area, including the fast flux test facility and the Pacific Northwest laboratories;

(3) The existence of the one thousand acres leased by the state from the federal government for the purpose of nuclear-related industries; and

(4) The ability for high-technology and medical industries to safely dispose of low-level radioactive waste at the Hanford commercial low-level waste disposal facility.

[ 1990 c 281 s 3.]

NOTES:

Legislative findings—1990 c 281: See note following RCW 43.31.205.